Massachusetts, session 194th, S2729.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1 of chapter 91 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by inserting after the word “water”, in line 37, the following words:- and of
passing freely across the tidelands by running, walking and accessing swimming and snorkeling.
of 1